src/fst/test/gt-norm-yamls/NI_A_mashkimod_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfs
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
     
Tests:
     
  NI - A - mashkimod :
     
  #Template Key
  #1	2	3	4	5	6	7
  #per	dim	the	pej	pos	mod	num
     
     #Isolation form
     mashkimod+NI: mashkimod
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1
     1+mashkimod+NI: nimashkimod
     2+mashkimod+NI: gimashkimod
     3+mashkimod+NI: omashkimod
     X+mashkimod+NI: imashkimod
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2
     mashkimod+NI+Con: mashkimodenh
     mashkimod+NI+Dim: mashkimodens
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4
     mashkimod+NI+Pej: mashkimodaash
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6
     mashkimod+NI+Prt: mashkimodaaban
     mashkimod+NI+Voc+Pl: mashkimodaadin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 7
     mashkimod+NI+4: mashkimodan
     mashkimod+NI+Loc: mashkimodaang
     mashkimod+NI+Pl: mashkimodan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con: nimashkimodenh
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim: nimashkimodens
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con: gimashkimodenh
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim: gimashkimodens
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con: omashkimodenh
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim: omashkimodens
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con: imashkimodenh
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim: imashkimodens
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos: nimashkimodaam
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos: gimashkimodaam
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos: omashkimodaam
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos: imashkimodaam
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej: nimashkimodaash
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej: gimashkimodaash
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej: omashkimodaash
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pej: imashkimodaash
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl: nimashkimodaanaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl: gimashkimodaanaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl: gimashkimodaawaa
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4: omashkimodaani
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl: omashkimodaawaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+Prt: nimashkimodaaban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodaadin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Prt: gimashkimodaaban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaadin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Prt: omashkimodaaban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaadin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Prt: imashkimodaaban
     X+mashkimod+NI+Voc+Pl: imashkimodaadin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+4: nimashkimodan
     1+mashkimod+NI+Loc: nimashkimodaang
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pl: nimashkimodan
     2+mashkimod+NI+4: gimashkimodan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Loc: gimashkimodaang
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pl: gimashkimodan
     3+mashkimod+NI+4: omashkimodan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Loc: omashkimodaang
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pl: omashkimodan
     X+mashkimod+NI+4: imashkimodan
     X+mashkimod+NI+Loc: imashkimodaang
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pl: imashkimodan
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 4
     mashkimod+NI+Con+Pej: mashkimodenyish
     mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pej: mashkimodensish
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 6
     mashkimod+NI+Con+Prt: mashkimodenyiban
     mashkimod+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: mashkimodenyidin
     mashkimod+NI+Dim+Prt: mashkimodensiban
     mashkimod+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: mashkimodensidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 2, 7
     mashkimod+NI+Con+4: mashkimodenyin
     mashkimod+NI+Con+Loc: mashkimodenying
     mashkimod+NI+Con+Pl: mashkimodenyin
     mashkimod+NI+Dim+4: mashkimodensan
     mashkimod+NI+Dim+Loc: mashkimodensing
     mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pl: mashkimodensan
     
     
     
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 6
     mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt: mashkimodaashiban
     mashkimod+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: mashkimodaashidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 4, 7
     mashkimod+NI+Pej+4: mashkimodaashan
     mashkimod+NI+Pej+Loc: mashkimodaashing
     mashkimod+NI+Pej+Pl: mashkimodaashan
     
     
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 6, 7
     mashkimod+NI+Prt+4: mashkimodaabaniin
     mashkimod+NI+Prt+Loc: mashkimodaabaniing
     mashkimod+NI+Prt+Pl: mashkimodaabaniin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 3
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos: nimashkimodenyim
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos: nimashkimodensim
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos: gimashkimodenyim
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos: gimashkimodensim
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos: omashkimodenyim
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos: omashkimodensim
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pos: imashkimodenyim
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pos: imashkimodensim
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 4
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pej: nimashkimodenyish
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pej: nimashkimodensish
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pej: gimashkimodenyish
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pej: gimashkimodensish
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pej: omashkimodenyish
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pej: omashkimodensish
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pej: imashkimodenyish
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pej: imashkimodensish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 5
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+1+Pl: nimashkimodenyinaan
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+1+Pl: nimashkimodensinaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+1+Pl: gimashkimodenyinaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+3+Pl: gimashkimodenyiwaa
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+1+Pl: gimashkimodensinaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+Pl: gimashkimodensiwaa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+3+4: omashkimodenyini
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+3+Pl: omashkimodenyiwaa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+4: omashkimodensini
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+3+Pl: omashkimodensiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Prt: nimashkimodenyiban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodenyidin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Prt: nimashkimodensiban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodensidin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Prt: gimashkimodenyiban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodenyidin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Prt: gimashkimodensiban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodensidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Prt: omashkimodenyiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: omashkimodenyidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Prt: omashkimodensiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: omashkimodensidin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Prt: imashkimodenyiban
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Voc+Pl: imashkimodenyidin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Prt: imashkimodensiban
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Voc+Pl: imashkimodensidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 2, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+4: nimashkimodenyin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Loc: nimashkimodenying
     1+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pl: nimashkimodenyin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+4: nimashkimodensan
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Loc: nimashkimodensing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pl: nimashkimodensan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+4: gimashkimodenyin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Loc: gimashkimodenying
     2+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pl: gimashkimodenyin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+4: gimashkimodensan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Loc: gimashkimodensing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pl: gimashkimodensan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+4: omashkimodenyin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Loc: omashkimodenying
     3+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pl: omashkimodenyin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+4: omashkimodensan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Loc: omashkimodensing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pl: omashkimodensan
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+4: imashkimodenyin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Loc: imashkimodenying
     X+mashkimod+NI+Con+Pl: imashkimodenyin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+4: imashkimodensan
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Loc: imashkimodensing
     X+mashkimod+NI+Dim+Pl: imashkimodensan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 4
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej: nimashkimodaamish
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej: gimashkimodaamish
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej: omashkimodaamish
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pej: imashkimodaamish
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 5
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl: nimashkimodaaminaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+1+Pl: gimashkimodaaminaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl: gimashkimodaamiwaa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+4: omashkimodaamini
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+3+Pl: omashkimodaamiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt: nimashkimodaamiban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodaamidin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt: gimashkimodaamiban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaamidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt: omashkimodaamiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaamidin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Prt: imashkimodaamiban
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Voc+Pl: imashkimodaamidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 3, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+4: nimashkimodaaman
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Loc: nimashkimodaaming
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pl: nimashkimodaaman
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+4: gimashkimodaaman
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Loc: gimashkimodaaming
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pl: gimashkimodaaman
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+4: omashkimodaaman
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Loc: omashkimodaaming
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pl: omashkimodaaman
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+4: imashkimodaaman
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Loc: imashkimodaaming
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pos+Pl: imashkimodaaman
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 5
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl: nimashkimodaashinaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+1+Pl: gimashkimodaashinaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl: gimashkimodaashiwaa
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+4: omashkimodaashini
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+3+Pl: omashkimodaashiwaa
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt: nimashkimodaashiban
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodaashidin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt: gimashkimodaashiban
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaashidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt: omashkimodaashiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaashidin
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Prt: imashkimodaashiban
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Voc+Pl: imashkimodaashidin
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 4, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+4: nimashkimodaashan
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Loc: nimashkimodaashing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Pl: nimashkimodaashan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+4: gimashkimodaashan
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Loc: gimashkimodaashing
     2+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Pl: gimashkimodaashan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+4: omashkimodaashan
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Loc: omashkimodaashing
     3+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Pl: omashkimodaashan
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pej+4: imashkimodaashan
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Loc: imashkimodaashing
     X+mashkimod+NI+Pej+Pl: imashkimodaashan
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 6
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Prt: nimashkimodaanaaniban
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: nimashkimodaanaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodaanaaniban
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaanaanidig
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Prt: gimashkimodaawaaban
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: gimashkimodaawaadig
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4+Prt: omashkimodaaniiban
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaaniidin
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Prt: omashkimodaawaaban
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Voc+Pl: omashkimodaawaadig
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 5, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+4: nimashkimodaanaanin
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Loc: nimashkimodaanaaning
     1+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Pl: nimashkimodaanaanig
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+4: gimashkimodaanaanin
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaanaaning
     2+mashkimod+NI+1+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaanaanig
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+4: gimashkimodaawaan
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Loc: gimashkimodaawaang
     2+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Pl: gimashkimodaawaag
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4+4: omashkimodaaniwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4+Loc: omashkimodaaniing
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+4+Pl: omashkimodaaniwa
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+4: omashkimodaawaan
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Loc: omashkimodaawaang
     3+mashkimod+NI+3+Pl+Pl: omashkimodaawaag
     
     #Values from slots numbered: 1, 6, 7
     1+mashkimod+NI+Prt+4: nimashkimodaabaniin
     1+mashkimod+NI+Prt+Loc: nimashkimodaabaniing
     1+mashkimod+NI+Prt+Pl: nimashkimodaabaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Prt+4: gimashkimodaabaniin
     2+mashkimod+NI+Prt+Loc: gimashkimodaabaniing
